Massachusetts, session 194th, H4190.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 1 of chapter 51 of the General
Laws, or any other general or special law, rule or regulation to the contrary, lawful permanent
residents 18 years or older who reside in Amherst may, upon application, have their name
entered on a list of registered voters established by the town clerk for the city known as the town
of Amherst and may thereafter vote in any election for local offices or local ballot questions.
SECTION 2. The town council of the city known as the town of Amherst may formulate
regulations and guidelines to implement the purpose of this act.
of 2

SECTION 3. Nothing in this act shall be construed to confer upon lawful permanent
residents the right to vote for any state or federal office or any state or federal ballot question.
of 2